Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.030

Court-ordered meeting.

(1) The superior court of the county in which the corporation's registered office is located may, after notice to the corporation, summarily order a meeting to be held:

(a) On application of any shareholder of the corporation entitled to vote in the election of directors at an annual meeting, if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six months after the end of the corporation's fiscal year or fifteen months after its last annual meeting or approval of corporate action by shareholder consent in lieu of such a meeting; or

(b) On application of a shareholder who executed a demand for a special meeting valid under RCW 23B.07.020, if:

(i) Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty days after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation's secretary; or

(ii) The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

(2) The court may, after notice to the corporation, fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares and shareholders entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the manner, form, and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting, or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for approval of those matters, and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

[ 2009 c 189 s 13; 2002 c 297 s 22; 1989 c 165 s 62.]